Wisconsin, session 2025, SB386.
do enact as follows:SB386,11Section 1. 217.12 of the statutes is created to read:SB386,2,22217.12 Virtual currency kiosks. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB386,2,53(a) “Fiat currency” means a medium of exchange that is authorized or 4adopted by the federal government as part of its currency and is not backed by a 5commodity.SB386,2,76(b) “Transaction” means a transaction conducted by means of a virtual 7currency kiosk.SB386,2,88(c) “Virtual currency” has the meaning given in s. 177.01 (16).SB386,2,129(d) “Virtual currency kiosk" means an electronic terminal or retail location, in 10this state, from which a person may exchange fiat currency for virtual currency or 11virtual currency for fiat currency or other virtual currency, including by connecting 12to a separate virtual currency exchange.SB386,3,21(e) “Virtual currency kiosk operator" means a person engaged in the business 2of operating virtual currency kiosks in this state.SB386,3,53(2) License required. No person may engage in the business of operating 4virtual currency kiosks in this state unless the person is licensed under this 5chapter.SB386,3,86(3) Warning. (a) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall affix to the front of 7each virtual currency kiosk, within the customer’s field of vision, the following 8printed warning, capitalized as indicated:SB386,3,169“FRAUD ALERT! Criminals seek to defraud virtual currency customers by 10impersonating loved ones, government officials, law enforcement officers, or 11charities; threatening jail time; stating that your identity was stolen or your 12accounts frozen; or claiming your computer was hacked. IF SOMEONE YOU 13DON’T KNOW IS ASKING YOU TO SEND VIRTUAL CURRENCY FROM THIS 14MACHINE, DO NOT PROCEED WITH THE TRANSACTION. LOSSES DUE TO 15FRAUDULENT OR ACCIDENTAL TRANSACTIONS MAY NOT BE 16RECOVERABLE.”SB386,3,2117(b) A virtual currency kiosk operator shall ensure that, as part of each virtual 18currency kiosk transaction, the warning under par. (a) is also displayed 19electronically on the virtual currency kiosk screen before any other disclosure 20appears on the screen and that the customer affirmatively acknowledges the 21warning before the customer may proceed with the transaction.SB386,3,2322(c) The warning affixed to the front of a virtual currency kiosk under par. (a) 23shall be printed in type size no smaller than 20 point.SB386,4,224(4) Customer identification. (a) Collection of information. Before entering 1into an initial transaction with an individual, a virtual currency kiosk operator 2shall verify the individual’s identity by doing all of the following:SB386,4,331. Collecting all of the following information pertaining to the individual:SB386,4,44a. Full legal name.SB386,4,55b. Date of birth.SB386,4,66c. Telephone number.SB386,4,77d. Residence address.SB386,4,88e. Email address.SB386,4,1092. Obtaining a copy of the individual’s driver’s license, passport, or other 10government-issued identification document that identifies the individual.SB386,4,1211(b) Identity verification for each transaction. In each transaction with a 12customer, a virtual currency kiosk operator shall do all of the following:SB386,4,14131. Verify the customer’s identity before accepting payment from or dispensing 14funds to the customer.SB386,4,16152. Take a photograph of the customer in a retainable format at the virtual 16currency kiosk.SB386,4,1917(c) False or multiple identities. 1. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not 18complete a transaction with a customer unless the virtual currency kiosk operator 19has verified the customer’s identity as provided in par. (b) 1.SB386,4,23202. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not allow a customer to engage in a 21transaction under any name or identity other than the customer's own true name 22and identity, or under any account other than an account associated with the 23customer’s true name and identity. SB386,5,324(5) Transaction restrictions and refunds. (a) Daily transaction limit. A 1virtual currency kiosk operator may not accept from or dispense to a customer, by 2means of any virtual currency kiosk, more than a total of $1,000 in fiat currency in 3the same day.SB386,5,94(b) Fee limit. A virtual currency kiosk operator may not collect fees or other 5charges from a customer in connection with a transaction that exceed the greater of 6$5 or 3 percent of the transaction amount. For purposes of this paragraph, “fees or 7other charges” includes any difference between the price charged to a customer to 8buy, sell, exchange, or convert virtual currency and the prevailing market value of 9the virtual currency at the time of the transaction.SB386,5,1210(c) Refund in certain circumstances. Upon request of a customer, a virtual 11currency kiosk operator shall issue a refund to the customer for the full amount of 12any transaction if all of the following apply with respect to the transaction:SB386,5,13131. The customer was fraudulently induced to engage in the transaction.SB386,5,16142. Not later than 30 days after the transaction, the customer contacted the 15virtual currency kiosk operator and a government or law enforcement agency to 16inform them of the fraudulent nature of the transaction.SB386,217Section 2. Initial applicability.SB386,5,2018(1) Customer identification requirements. The treatment of s. 217.12 (4) 19first applies to transactions occurring on the 60th day after the effective date of this 20subsection.SB386,5,2121